Missouri, session 2026, HB3420.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 10, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 10.289, to read as follows:
10.289. The city of Bland is selected for and shall be officially known as "The
2 Silver City of the Rock Island Trail" for the state of Missouri.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.